Idaho, session 2026, S1401.
Be It Enacted by the Legislature of the State of Idaho:
SECTION 1. In addition to any other appropriation provided by law,
there is hereby appropriated to the Department of Health and Welfare for the
Public Health Services Division the following amounts to be expended accord-
ing to the designated programs and expense classes from the listed funds for
the period July 1, 2026, through June 30, 2027:
FOR
FOR FOR TRUSTEE AND
PERSONNEL OPERATING BENEFIT
COSTS EXPENDITURES PAYMENTS TOTAL
I. PHYSICAL HEALTH SERVICES:
FROM:
Idaho Immunization Dedicated Vaccine
Fund $28,020,000 $28,020,000
Cooperative Welfare (Federal)
Fund $960,400 2,577,200 $3,868,800 7,406,400
TOTAL $960,400 $30,597,200 $3,868,800 $35,426,400
II. LABORATORY SERVICES:
FROM:
Cooperative Welfare (Dedicated)
Fund $78,400 $200,000 $278,400


FOR
FOR FOR TRUSTEE AND
PERSONNEL OPERATING BENEFIT
COSTS EXPENDITURES PAYMENTS TOTAL
III. SUICIDE PREVENTION AND AWARENESS:
FROM:
Cooperative Welfare (General)
Fund $3,900 $15,100 $19,000
GRAND TOTAL $1,038,800 $30,801,100 $3,883,900 $35,723,800
SECTION 2. Notwithstanding any other provision of law to the contrary,
the appropriation made to the Department of Health and Welfare for the Public
Health Services Division for the Laboratory Services Program is hereby re-
duced by $78,400 for personnel costs from the Cooperative Welfare (Federal)
Fund for the period July 1, 2026, through June 30, 2027.
SECTION 3. FTP AUTHORIZATION. Notwithstanding any other authorization
provided by law, the full-time equivalent position authorization provided
to the Department of Health and Welfare for the Public Health Services Divi-
sion is hereby reduced by three (3.00) for the period July 1, 2026, through
June 30, 2027.
SECTION 4. REQUIRING A REPORT FOR THE SUICIDE PREVENTION AND AWARENESS
PROGRAM. The Department of Health and Welfare shall submit a report to the
Joint Finance-Appropriations Committee by December 31, 2026, identifying
outcomes and return on investment for moneys appropriated for the Suicide
Prevention and Awareness Program. The format and content of this report will
be determined in consultation with the Budget and Policy Analysis Division
of the Legislative Services Office.
SECTION 5. REQUIRING A REPORT FOR THE HIV PREVENTION AND SURVEILLANCE
PROGRAM. The Department of Health and Welfare and the Public Health Dis-
tricts shall submit a report to the Joint Finance-Appropriations Committee
by December 31, 2026, identifying outcomes and return on investment for
moneys appropriated for the HIV Prevention and Surveillance Program. The
format and content of this report will be determined in consultation with the
Budget and Policy Analysis Division of the Legislative Services Office.
SECTION 6. REQUIRING A REPORT FOR THE HEPATITIS PREVENTION AND SURVEIL-
LANCE PROGRAM. The Department of Health and Welfare shall submit a report to
the Joint Finance-Appropriations Committee by December 31, 2026, identify-
ing outcomes and return on investment for moneys appropriated for the Hep-
atitis Prevention and Surveillance Program. The format and content of this
report will be determined in consultation with the Budget and Policy Analy-
sis Division of the Legislative Services Office.


SECTION 7. REQUIRING A REPORT FOR THE IMMUNIZATION ASSESSMENT FUND. The
Department of Health and Welfare shall submit a report to the Joint Finance-
Appropriations Committee by December 31, 2026, identifying the vaccine uti-
lization rate and a cost-savings analysis for the State of Idaho and ser-
vice providers regarding vaccines purchased using the Immunization Assess-
ment Fund. The format and content of this report will be determined in con-
sultation with the Budget and Policy Analysis Division of the Legislative
Services Office.
SECTION 8. CONDITIONS, LIMITATIONS, AND RESTRICTIONS. Appropriations
made pursuant to this act are subject to the conditions, limitations, and re-
strictions specified in this act.
SECTION 9. An emergency existing therefor, which emergency is hereby
declared to exist, this act shall be in full force and effect on and after
July 1, 2026.